Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.869

Faculty tenure—Review committees, composition—Selection of faculty representatives, student representative.

The review committees required by RCW 28B.50.850 through 28B.50.869 shall be composed of members of the administrative staff, a student representative, and the faculty. The representatives of the faculty shall represent a majority of the members on each review committee. The members representing the faculty on each review committee shall be selected by a majority of the faculty and faculty department heads acting in a body. The student representative, who shall be a full time student, shall be chosen by the student association of the particular community or technical college in such manner as the members thereof shall determine.

[ 1993 c 188 s 2; 1991 c 238 s 70; 1974 ex.s. c 33 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 283 s 45. Formerly RCW 28.85.869.]

NOTES:

Construction—Effective date—Severability—1993 c 188: See notes following RCW 28B.50.851.

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 283: See note following RCW 28A.150.050.